test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-klasse4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tjoehpedh: # verb 4, stem -e, root vowel oe-
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Inf: tjoehpedh
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tjoehpem
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tjoehph
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tjuahpa
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: tjuehpien
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [tjoehpeden, tjoehpijidien]
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: tjoehpijægan
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [tjoehpebe, tjoehpijibie]
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [tjoehpede, tjoehpijidie]
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tjuehpieh
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tjoehpim
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tjoehpih
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tjoehpi
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: tjoehpimen
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: tjoehpiden
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: tjoehpigan
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tjoehpimh
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tjoehpidh
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tjoehpin
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: tjoehph
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [tjoehpeden, tjoehpijidien]
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [tjoehpede, tjoehpijidie] 
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+ConNeg: tjoehph
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+Ger: tjoehpeminie
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: tjoehpeme
    tjoehpedh+V+TV+VGen: tjoehpen 

  Verb - vïssjedh: # verb 4, stem -ï, root vowel -e-
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Inf: vïssjedh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vïssjem
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vïssjh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: væssja
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vissjien
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vïssjeden, vïssjijidien]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vïssjijægan
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vïssjebe, vïssjijibie]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vïssjede, vïssjijidie]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vissjieh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vïssjim
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vïssjih
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vïssji
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vïssjimen
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vïssjiden
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vïssjigan
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vïssjimh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vïssjidh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vïssjin
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vïssjh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vïssjeden, vïssjijidien]
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vïssjede, vïssjijidie] 
    vïssjedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vïssjh
    vïssjedh+V+IV+Ger: vïssjeminie
    vïssjedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vïssjeme
    vïssjedh+V+IV+VGen: vïssjen   

  Verb - vïenhtedh: # verb IV, stem -e, root vowel -ïe-
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Inf: vïenhtedh
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vïenhtem
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vïenhth
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veanhta
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vienhtien
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vïenhteden, vïenhtijidien]
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vïenhtijægan
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vïenhtebe, vïenhtijibie]
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vïenhtede, vïenhtijidie]
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vienhtieh
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vïenhtim
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vïenhtih
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vïenhti
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vïenhtimen
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vïenhtiden
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vïenhtigan
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vïenhtimh
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vïenhtidh
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vïenhtin
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: vïenhth
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [vïenhteden, vïenhtijidien]
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [vïenhtede, vïenhtijidie] 
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+ConNeg: vïenhth
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+Ger: vïenhteminie
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: vïenhteme
    vïenhtedh+V+TV+VGen: vïenhten

  Verb - vajmedh: # verb IV, stem -e, root vowel -a-
    vajmedh+V+IV+Inf: vajmedh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vajmem
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vajmh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vajma
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vejmien
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vajmeden, vajmijidien]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vajmijægan
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vajmebe, vajmijibie]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vajmede, vajmijidie]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vejmieh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vajmim
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vajmih
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vajmi
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vajmimen
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vajmiden
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vajmigan
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vajmimh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vajmidh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vajmin
    vajmedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vajmh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vajmeden, vajmijidien]
    vajmedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vajmede, vajmijidie]
    vajmedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vajmh
    vajmedh+V+IV+Ger: vajmeminie
    vajmedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vajmeme
    vajmedh+V+IV+VGen: vajmen  

  Verb - vaaksjedh: # verb I, stem -e, root vowel -aa-
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Inf: vaaksjedh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vaaksjem
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vaaksjh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaksja
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vaeksjien
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vaaksjeden, vaaksjijidien]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vaaksjijægan
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vaaksjebe, vaaksjijibie]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vaaksjede, vaaksjijidie]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vaeksjieh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vaaksjim] 
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vaaksjih]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaaksji
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: vaaksjimen
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: vaaksjiden
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: vaaksjigan
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vaaksjimh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vaaksjidh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vaaksjin
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: vaaksjh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [vaaksjeden, vaaksjijidien]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [vaaksjede, vaaksjijidie]
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+ConNeg: vaaksjh
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+Ger: vaaksjeminie
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: vaaksjeme
    vaaksjedh+V+IV+VGen: vaaksjen

  Verb - sovkedh: # verb I, stem -e, root vowel -o-
    sovkedh+V+IV+Inf: sovkedh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sovkem
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sovkh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: såvka
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: suvkien
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [sovkeden, sovkijidien]
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: sovkijægan
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [sovkebe, sovkijibie]
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [sovkede, sovkijidie]
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: suvkieh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sovkim 
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sovkih
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sovki
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: sovkimen
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: sovkiden
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: sovkigan
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sovkimh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sovkidh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sovkin
    sovkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: sovkh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [sovkeden, sovkijidien]
    sovkedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [sovkede, sovkijidie] 
    sovkedh+V+IV+ConNeg: sovkh
    sovkedh+V+IV+Ger: sovkeminie
    sovkedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: sovkeme
    sovkedh+V+IV+VGen: sovken


#### SNM 20.3.2018: Outcommented, the verb is not in lexc/the analyser
#  Verb - dijveldovvedh: # verb 4, stem -e, root vowel -o-
#
#    dïjveldovvedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: dïjveldåvva
#    dïjveldovvedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: dïjvelduvvieh
#    dïjveldovvedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: dïjveldovvi
#    dïjveldovvedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: dïjveldovvin
